Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-337
Hospital, clinic, institution; not required to admit patient for abortion.

No hospital, clinic, institution, or other facility in this state shall be required to admit any patient for the purpose of performing an abortion nor required to allow the performance of an abortion therein, but the hospital, clinic, institution, or other facility shall inform the patient of its policy not to participate in abortion procedures. No cause of action shall arise against any hospital, clinic, institution, or other facility for refusing to perform or allow an abortion.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 52.